North Carolina statutes. Chapter 62. Public Utilities.
Article 14. Fees and Charges.

§ 62-300.
Particular fees and charges fixed; payment.

The Commission shall receive and collect the following fees and charges in accordance with the classification of utilities as provided in rules and regulations of the Commission, and no others:

Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) with each notice of appeal to the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court, and with each notice of application for a writ of certiorari.

With each application for a new certificate for motor carrier rights, the fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) when filed by Class 1 motor carriers, one hundred dollars ($100.00) when filed by Class 2 motor carriers, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) when filed by Class 3 motor carriers, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) as filing fee for any amendment thereto so as to extend or enlarge the scope of operations thereunder, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each broker who applies for a brokerage license under the provisions of this Chapter.

With each application for a general increase in rates, fares and charges and for each filing of a tariff which seeks general increases in rates, fares and charges, the fee will be five hundred dollars ($500.00) for Class A utilities and Class 1 motor carriers, two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for Class B utilities and Class 2 motor carriers, one hundred dollars ($100.00) for Class C utilities and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for Class D utilities and Class 3 motor carriers; provided that in the case of an application or tariff for a general increase in rates filed by a tariff agent for more than one carrier, the applicable fee shall be the highest fee prescribed for any motor carrier included in the application or tariff. This fee shall not apply to applications for adjustments in particular rates, fares, or charges for the purpose of eliminating inequities, preferences or discriminations or to applications to adjust rates and charges based solely on the increased cost of fuel used in the generation or production of electric power.

One hundred dollars ($100.00) with each application by motor carrier of passengers for the abandonment or permanent or temporary discontinuance of transportation service previously authorized in a certificate.

(4a)

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-128, s. 10.

With each application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity or for any amendment thereto so as to extend or enlarge the scope of operations thereunder, the fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for Class A utilities, one hundred dollars ($100.00) for Class B utilities, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for Class C and D utilities and two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for any other person seeking a certificate of public convenience and necessity.

(5a)

With each application by a bus company for an original certificate of authority or for any amendment thereto or to an existing certificate of public convenience and necessity so as to extend or enlarge the scope of operations thereunder the fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).

With each application for approval of the issuance of securities or for the approval of any sale, lease, hypothecation, lien, or other transfer of any household goods or operating rights of any carrier or public utility over which the Commission has jurisdiction, the fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for Class A utilities and Class 1 motor carriers, one hundred dollars ($100.00) for Class B utilities and Class 2 motor carriers, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for Class C and D utilities and Class 3 motor carriers; provided, that in the case of sales, leases and transfers between two or more carriers or utilities, the applicable fee shall be the highest fee prescribed for any party to the transaction.

Ten dollars ($10.00) with each application, petition, or complaint not embraced in (2) through (6) of this section, wherein such application, petition, or complaint seeks affirmative relief against a carrier or public utility over which the Commission has jurisdiction. This fee shall not apply to applications for adjustments in particular rates, fares or charges for the purpose of eliminating inequities, preferences or discriminations; nor shall this fee apply to applications, petitions, or complaints made by any county, city or town; nor shall this fee apply to applications or petitions made by individuals seeking service or relief from a public utility.

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 454, s. 18.

One dollar ($1.00) for each page (8 1/2 x 11 inches) of transcript of testimony, but not less than five dollars ($5.00) for any such transcript.

Twenty cents (20¢) for each page of copies of papers, orders, certificates or other records, but not less than one dollar ($1.00) for any such order or record, plus five dollars ($5.00) for formal certification of any such paper, order or record.

, (12) Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 454, s. 18.

(13)

Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) with each application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity to construct a transmission line.

(14)

Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) with each filing by a person otherwise exempt from Commission regulation under Public Law 103-305 to participate in standard transportation practices as set out by the Commission.

(15)

One hundred dollars ($100.00) for each application for exemption filed by nonprofit and consumer-owned water or sewer utilities pursuant to

G.S. 62-110.5

.

(16)

Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) with each application for a certificate of authority to engage in business as an electric generator lessor filed pursuant to

G.S. 62-126.7

or each registration statement for a renewable energy facility or new renewable energy facility filed pursuant to

G.S. 62-133.8

(
l
).

(17)

Fifty dollars ($50.00) for each report of proposed construction filed by the owner of an electric generating facility that is exempt from the certification requirements of G.S. 62-110.1(a).

All witness fees, officers’ fees serving papers, and cost of serving notice by publication shall be paid by the party at whose instance or for whose benefit such fees and costs are incurred.

No application, petition, complaint, notice of appeal, notice of application for writ of certiorari, or other document or paper, the filing of which requires the payment of a fee under this Article, shall be deemed filed until the fees herein required shall have been paid to the Commission.

The fees and charges as set forth in subdivisions (1), (7), (9) and (10) of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to the State of North Carolina or to any board, department, commission, institution or other agency of the State; and all applications, petitions or complaints submitted by the State of North Carolina or any board, department, commission, institution or other agency of the State shall be filed without the payment of the fees required by this section. All transcripts, papers, orders, certificates, or other records necessary to perfect an appeal, or to determine whether an appeal is to be taken, shall be furnished without charge to the Attorney General upon his request in cases in which the Attorney General appears in the public interest or as representing any board, department, commission, institution or other agency of the State.

The provisions of this section shall apply with respect to the regulation of electric membership corporations as provided in

G.S. 117-18.1

.

History.

1953, c. 825, s. 1; 1955, c. 64; 1957, c. 1152, s. 15; 1961, c. 472, ss. 2-4; 1963, c. 1165, s. 1; 1967, c. 1039; c. 1190, s. 7; 1969, c. 721, s. 2; 1971, c. 736, s. 2; 1975, c. 447, s. 1; 1977, c. 1003; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 129, s. 32; 1979, c. 792; 1985, c. 311, ss. 1-4; c. 454, ss. 18, 19; c. 676, s. 24; 1991, c. 189, s. 2; 1995, c. 523, ss. 29, 32; 1997-437, s. 3; 1998-128, s. 10; 1999-180, s. 6; 2017-192, s. 10(b); 2021-23, s. 26(a).

Utility Commission Fees and Charges.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 15.16A(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Utilities Commission and Public Staff shall jointly review all fees and charges provided for in

G.S. 62-300

to determine (i) whether the fees and charges are sufficient to cover the costs of processing the applications and filings required by

G.S. 62-300

and (ii) whether new categories should be established to impose fees or charges on persons or entities who make applications or filings to the Utilities Commission but are not expressly included in any of the current categories listed in G.S. 62-300. The review may also include any other relevant matters related to fees and charges for applications and filings made to the Utilities Commission.

“(b) By April 1, 2016, the Utilities Commission and Public Staff shall report their findings, including any recommendations on amending the fees and charges for applications and filings under

G.S. 62-300

, to the Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division.”

§ 62-301.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 787, s. 2.

§ 62-302.
Regulatory fee.

Fee Imposed. — It is the policy of the State of North Carolina to provide fair regulation of public utilities in the interest of the public, as provided in

G.S. 62-2

. The cost of regulating public utilities is a burden incident to the privilege of operating as a public utility. Therefore, for the purpose of defraying the cost of regulating public utilities, every public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission shall pay a quarterly regulatory fee, in addition to all other fees and taxes, as provided in this section. The fees collected shall be used only to pay the expenses of the Commission and the Public Staff in regulating public utilities in the interest of the public and to maintain a reasonable margin for a reserve fund. The amount of the reserve may not exceed one-half of the cost of operating the Commission and the Public Staff as reflected in the certified budget for the previous fiscal year.It is also the policy of the State to provide limited oversight of certain electric membership corporations as provided in

G.S. 62-53

. Therefore, for the purpose of defraying the cost of providing the oversight authorized by

G.S. 62-53

and

G.S. 117-18.1

, each fiscal year each electric membership corporation whose principal purpose is to furnish or cause to be furnished bulk electric supplies at wholesale as provided in

G.S. 117-16

shall pay an annual fee as provided in this section.

Public Utility Rate. —

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-140, s. 56, effective July 21, 2000.

Unless adjusted under subdivision (3) of this subsection, the public utility fee is a percentage of a utility’s jurisdictional revenues as follows:

Click to view

In the first half of each calendar year, the Commission shall review the estimated cost of operating the Commission and the Public Staff for the next fiscal year, including a reasonable margin for the reserve fund allowed under this section. In making this determination, the Commission shall consider all relevant factors that may affect the cost of operating the Commission or the Public Staff or a possible unanticipated change in competitive and noncompetitive jurisdictional revenues. If the estimated receipts provided for under this section are less than the estimated cost of operating the Commission and the Public Staff for the next fiscal year, including the reasonable margin for the reserve fund, then the Commission may increase the public utility regulatory fee on noncompetitive jurisdictional revenues effective for the next fiscal year. In no event may the percentage rate of the public utility regulatory fee on noncompetitive jurisdiction revenues exceed seventeen and one-half hundredths of one percent (0.175%). If the estimated receipts provided for under this section are more than the estimated cost of operating the Commission and the Public Staff for the next fiscal year, including the reasonable margin for the reserve fund, then the Commission shall decrease the public utility regulatory fee on noncompetitive jurisdictional revenues effective for the next fiscal year.

As used in this section:

“Noncompetitive jurisdictional revenues” means all revenues derived or realized from intrastate tariffs, rates, and charges approved or allowed by the Commission or collected pursuant to Commission order or rule, but not including tap-on fees or any other form of contributions in aid of construction.

“Subsection (h) competitive jurisdictional revenues” means all revenues derived from retail services provided by local exchange companies and competing local providers that have elected to operate under G.S. 62-133.5(h).

“Subsection (m) competitive jurisdictional revenues” means all revenues derived from retail services provided by local exchange companies and competing local providers that have elected to operate under G.S. 62-133.5(m).

(b1)

Electric Membership Corporation Rate. —

The electric membership corporation regulatory fee for each fiscal year is two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

When Due. — The electric membership corporation regulatory fee imposed under this section shall be paid in quarterly installments. The fee is due and payable to the Commission on or before the 15th day of the second month following the end of each quarter.The public utility regulatory fee imposed under this section is due and payable to the Commission on or before the 15th day of the second month following the end of each quarter. Every public utility subject to the public utility regulatory fee shall, on or before the date the fee is due for each quarter, prepare and render a report on a form prescribed by the Commission. The report shall state the public utility’s total North Carolina jurisdictional revenues for the preceding quarter and shall be accompanied by any supporting documentation that the Commission may by rule require. Receipts shall be reported on an accrual basis.If a public utility’s report for the first quarter of any fiscal year shows that application of the percentage rate would yield a quarterly fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or less, the public utility shall pay an estimated fee for the entire fiscal year in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). If, after payment of the estimated fee, the public utility’s subsequent returns show that application of the percentage rate would yield quarterly fees that total more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the entire fiscal year, the public utility shall pay the cumulative amount of the fee resulting from application of the percentage rate, to the extent it exceeds the amount of fees, other than any surcharge, previously paid.

Use of Proceeds. — A special fund in the office of State Treasurer, the Utilities Commission and Public Staff Fund, is created. The fees collected pursuant to this section and all other funds received by the Commission or the Public Staff, except for the clear proceeds of civil penalties collected pursuant to G.S. 62-50(d) and the clear proceeds of funds forfeited pursuant to G.S. 62-310(a), shall be deposited in the Utilities Commission and Public Staff Fund. The Fund shall be placed in an interest bearing account and any interest or other income derived from the Fund shall be credited to the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall only be spent pursuant to appropriation by the General Assembly.The Utilities Commission and Public Staff Fund shall be subject to the provisions of the State Budget Act except that no unexpended surplus of the Fund shall revert to the General Fund. All funds credited to the Utilities Commission and Public Staff Fund shall be used only to pay the expenses of the Commission and the Public Staff in regulating public utilities in the interest of the public as provided by this Chapter and in regulating electric membership corporations as provided in

G.S. 117-18.1

.The clear proceeds of civil penalties collected pursuant to G.S. 62-50(d) and the clear proceeds of funds forfeited pursuant to G.S. 62-310(a) shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Fee changes. — If a utility’s regulatory fee obligation is changed, the Commission shall either adjust the utility’s rates to reflect the change or approve the utility’s request for an accounting order allowing deferral of the change in the fee obligation.

Noncompetitive jurisdiction revenues 0.148% Subsection (h) competitive jurisdictional revenues 0.04% Subsection (m) competitive jurisdictional revenues 0.02%

History.

1989, c. 787, s. 1; 1998-215, s. 126; 1999-180, s. 5; 2000-140, s. 56; 2006-203, s. 18; 2009-238, s. 6; 2011-52, s. 2; 2014-59, s. 1; 2015-134, ss. 1(a), 2, 3.

Percentage Rates for Calculating Regulatory Fee Under Subdivision (b)(2) Prior to the 2015 Amendment.

The percentage rates for calculating regulatory fees under subdivision (b)(2) prior to the effective date of the 2015 amendment were found in Session Laws 2008-107, s. 28.14(b), Session Laws 2009-451, s. 14.26(b), as amended by Session Laws 2010-31, s. 14.14, Session Laws 2011-145, s. 31.4(a), Session Laws 2012-74, s. 1(a), Session Laws 2013-360, s. 15.1(a), as amended by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 15.2B, and Session Laws 2014-59, ss. 2(a), (b), 3(a), (b), and 4.

The regulatory fees imposed under subsection (b1) prior to the effective date of the 2015 amendment were found in Session Laws 2008-107, s. 28.14(b), Session Laws 2009-451, s. 14.26(b), as amended by Session Laws 2010-31, s. 14.14, Session Laws 2011-145, s. 31.4(b), Session Laws 2012-74, s. 1(b), and Session Laws 2013-360, s. 15.1(b).

§ 62-302.1.
Regulatory fee for combustion residuals surface impoundments.

(Expires April 1, 2030 — see note) Fee Imposed. — Each public utility with a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment shall pay a regulatory fee for the purpose of defraying the costs of oversight of coal combustion residuals. The fee is in addition to the fee imposed under

G.S. 62-302

. The fees collected under this section shall only be used to pay the expenses of the Department of Environmental Quality in providing oversight of coal combustion residuals.

Rate. — The combustion residuals surface impoundment fee shall be twenty-two thousandths of one percent (0.022%) of the North Carolina jurisdictional revenues of each public utility with a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment. For the purposes of this section, the term “North Carolina jurisdictional revenues” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 62-302

.

When Due. — The fee shall be paid in quarterly installments. The fee is payable to the Department of Environmental Quality on or before the 15th of the second month following the end of each quarter. Each public utility subject to this fee shall, on or before the date the fee is due for each quarter, prepare and render a report on a form prescribed by the Department of Environmental Quality. The report shall state the public utility’s total North Carolina jurisdictional revenues for the preceding quarter and shall be accompanied by any supporting documentation that the Department of Environmental Quality may by rule require. Receipts shall be reported on an accrual basis.

Use of Proceeds. — A special fund in the Department of Environmental Quality is created. The fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Coal Combustion Residuals Management Fund. The Fund shall be placed in an interest-bearing account, and any interest or other income derived from the Fund shall be credited to the Fund. Subject to appropriation by the General Assembly, one hundred percent (100%) shall be used by the Department of Environmental Quality. All funds credited to the Fund shall be used only to pay the expenses of the Department of Environmental Quality in providing oversight of coal combustion residuals.

Recovery of Fee. — The North Carolina Utilities Commission shall not allow an electric public utility to recover this fee from the retail electric customers of the State.

History.

2014-122, s. 15(a); 2015-1, s. 3.6; 2015-7, s. 7; 2015-241, s. 14.30(c), (u); 2016-95, s. 2.

§§ 62-303 through 62-309.

Reserved for future codification purposes.